Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF685.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 2272YH (3) 91 sc/ns H.F. 685 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 8A.311C State agency contracts ââ 1 steel. 2 A state agency contract shall, if applicable, contain 3 a provision requiring that any steel that is purchased 4 pursuant to the contract using state moneys or tax credits be 5 manufactured in the United States. 6